Alaska statutes. Title 10. Corporations and Associations.
Chapter 50. Alaska Revised Limited Liability Company Act.

Editor’s notes. —

Chapter 78, SLA 1997 amended AS

10.50.070

,

10.50.125

,

10.50.150

,

10.50.155

,

10.50.185

,

10.50.265

,

10.50.400

,

10.50.405

,

10.50.425

,

10.50.990

, and

10.50.995

; added AS

10.50.570

; and repealed AS

10.50.075

(4),

10.50.085

,

10.50.190

,

10.50.195

,

10.50.240

, and

10.50.335

. Under § 24(a), ch. 78, SLA 1997, a “limited liability company whose original articles of organization were filed with the department on or after July 1, 1997, is governed by AS 10.50, as amended by [ch. 78, SLA 1997]” and a “limited liability company whose original articles of organization were filed with the department before July 1, 1997, is governed by AS 10.50, as amended by [ch. 78, SLA 1997] if its articles of organization are amended on or after July 1, 1997, to state that the company is to be governed by AS 10.50, as amended by [ch. 78, SLA 1997.]” For the text of the affected sections in effect on June 30, 1997, see the 1996 pamphlet for AS 10.

Opinions of attorney general. —

A Limited Liability Company (LLC) may lawfully apply for and receive a “liquor license” in the State of Alaska, provided the conditions of the current statute and regulations governing liquor licenses are met. For purposes of the liquor license statutes and regulations an LLC will be treated essentially the same as a partnership. December 6, 1995 Op. Atty Gen.

Neither an LLC nor its member is exempt from any liability with regard to the liquor laws in Title 4 of the Alaska Statutes and the ABC Board regulations. December 6, 1995 Op. Atty Gen.

The duties and responsibilities of licensees noted in AS

04.11.370(a)(5)

, AS

04.11.370(a)(11)

, AS

04.16.150

, and AS

04.21.030

would not be changed because the entity holding a license would be an LLC. In statutory interpretation, specific terms control over general terms. Therefore, the mere fact that an entity is an LLC does not relieve either the LLC or its members from compliance with the provisions of Title 4 relating to liquor laws. December 6, 1995 Op. Atty Gen.

An LLC that is properly organized under AS 10.50, meets the criteria specified in AS

36.30.170

(b)(1) — (3), and whose manager is a resident of Alaska, would qualify for the Alaska bidder preference under AS

36.30.170

. March 4, 1999 Op. Att’y Gen.